Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 12 Industrial Development and Siting
§ 35-12-119.
Exemptions; information required.

Nonmineral processing facilities to be constructed in existing industrial parks, as designated by local governments, are exempt from payment of fees and certification procedures but shall furnish the information required by W.S. 35-12-109(a)(iii), (iv) and (v) to the division if included in W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii).

State and local governmental units and agencies are exempt from the application and permit procedures of this chapter, but prior to commencing to construct any facility as provided in W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii), those units and agencies shall furnish to the division information required by W.S. 35-12-109(a)(iii), (iv) and (v).

The construction, operation and maintenance of the following activities are exempt from this chapter:

Electric transmission lines with a maximum operating voltage of less than one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) volts, except:

Any collector system, regardless of voltage, associated with a commercial facility generating electricity from wind and which meets the definition of an industrial facility pursuant to W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) and (F) shall not be exempt;

A commercial facility generating electricity from wind that is exempt from W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F) shall not become subject to this chapter because its collector system is greater than one hundred sixty thousand (160,000) volts.

Oil and gas drilling facilities;

All pipelines except coal slurry pipelines;

Oil and gas producing facilities;

Oil and gas wellfield activities.

Activities exempt under this section shall not be included as part of the application review of a facility subject to this chapter, and the council does not have jurisdiction over exempt activities. Applicants shall furnish the information required by W.S. 35-12-109(a)(iii), (iv), (v) and (viii) for exempt activities.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-502.94; W.S. 1977, § 35-12-121; Laws 1979, ch. 97, § 2; 1981, ch. 127, § 1; 1987, ch. 82, § 2; 1992, ch. 60, § 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 15, § 1; 2010, ch. 47, § 3.

The 2010 amendment,

rewrote the introductory language in (c)(i), and added (c)(i)(A) and (c)(i)(B).

Laws 2010, ch. 47, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.